Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2242
Local long-term care ombudsman program, defined.

Local long-term care ombudsman program means an entity, either public or private and nonprofit, designated as a local long-term care ombudsman program by the office.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 6;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 5.
April 12, 2018